Utah statutes.
75-5-105.   Bond of guardian.

A guardian coming into the possession or control of funds or other property of a minor or incapacitated person may be required by the court to furnish a bond in an amount and under the conditions as set forth for conservators in Sections 75-5-411 and 75-5-412.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

